Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.748, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5d. new text end new text begin Notice to petitioner. new text end new text begin Upon a petitioner's request, before a sheriff, law enforcement officer, or other peace officer serves a respondent with a temporary restraining order or restraining order issued under this section, the sheriff or officer must make reasonable efforts to notify the petitioner at least 24 hours before service that the respondent will be served with the order. For purposes of this subdivision, reasonable efforts include but are not limited to texting, calling, or emailing the petitioner if the petitioner's contact information is available to the sheriff, law enforcement officer, or peace officer. new text end